sl-SI: Graviranje: Besedilo po meri; Graviranje logotipa; Drugo
cs: Rytí/gravírování: Vlastní text; Gravírování loga; Jiné
zh-CN: 镌刻: 自定义文本; 标识雕刻; 其他
fi: Kaiverrus: Mukautettu teksti; Logokaiverrus; Muu
tr: Gravür: Özel metin; Logo işleme; Diğer
es: Grabado: Texto personalizado; Grabado de logotipo; Otros
ja: 彫刻: カスタムテキスト; ロゴ刻印; その他
pl: Grawerunek: Własny tekst; Grawerowanie logo; Inne
pt-BR: Gravação: Texto personalizado; Gravação de logotipo; Outro
zh-TW: 雕刻: 自訂文字; 標誌雕刻; 其他
vi: Điêu khắc: Văn bản tùy chỉnh; Khắc logo; Khác
da: Gravering: Brugerdefineret tekst; Logogravering; Andet
bg-BG: Гравиране: Персонализиран текст; Гравиране на лого; Други
ko: 새겨넣기: 맞춤 텍스트; 로고 각인; 기타
nl: Gravure: Aangepaste tekst; Logo-gravure; Andere
de: Gravur: Benutzerdefinierter Text; Logo-Gravur; Sonstiges
fr: Gravure: Texte personnalisé; Gravure de logos; Autre
nb: Gravering: Egendefinert tekst; Logogravering; Annet
hr-HR: Graviranje: Prilagođeni tekst; Graviranje logotipa; Ostalo
hu: Gravírozás: Egyéni szöveg; Logógravírozás; Egyéb
sk-SK: Gravírovanie: Vlastný text; Gravírovanie loga; Iné
lt-LT: Graviravimas: Pasirinktinis tekstas; Logotipo graviravimas; Kita
pt-PT: Gravação: Texto personalizado; Gravação de logótipo; Outro
en: Engraving: Custom text; Logo engraving; Other
th: การแกะสลัก: ข้อความที่กำหนดเอง; การแกะสลักโลโก้; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Gravare: Text personalizat; Gravură cu logo; Altele
el: Χάραξη: Προσαρμοσμένο κείμενο; Χάραξη λογότυπου; Άλλο
ru: Гравировка: Пользовательский текст; Гравировка логотипа; Другой
it: Incisione: Testo personalizzato; Incisione logo; Altro
sv: Gravering: Anpassad text; Logogravyr; Övrigt